Massachusetts, session 194th, H529.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
CHAPTER 111, SECTION 223 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
SUBSECTION (g), the following- “(h) The Massachusetts School Building Authority shall
promulgate regulations requiring applicants for funding for construction of new schools or
substantial renovations of school kitchens (1) to install dishwashers which will allow for the use
of reusable foodware, (2) to adopt procedures and an enforcement plan for reducing solid waste,
including recyclable materials and food scraps.”
of 1